Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GOODWILL EASTER SEALS MINNESOTA.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Goodwill Easter Seals Minnesota and its partners. The grant must be used to continue the FATHER Project in Rochester, St. Cloud, St. Paul, Minneapolis, and the surrounding areas to assist fathers in overcoming barriers that prevent fathers from supporting their children economically and emotionally, including with community reentry following confinement. new text end